Wyoming, session 2025, SF0131.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-15-123(f)(ix) is amended to read:
21-15-123. State construction department; duties and
authority relating to school facilities.
(f) The state construction department shall:
(ix) Review requests submitted by charter
schools pursuant to W.S. 21-3-110(a)(x) and 21-3-304(k) to
determine whether space exists within the applicable
district for operation of the charter school that is
available and adequate.
Section 2. W.S. 21-3-110(a)(x)(A)(II) is repealed.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0131
ENROLLED ACT NO. 12, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2